Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB225.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account holder." An individual who establishes, individually or jointly, a first-time home buyer savings account."Allowable closing costs." A disbursement listed on a settlement statement for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary.1234567891011121314151617 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible costs." The down payment and allowable closing costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary. Eligible costs shall not include costs incurred prior to the establishment of a first-time home buyer savings account."Financial institution." A bank, trust company, savings institution, credit union, broker-dealer, insurance company and mutual fund or similar entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth."First-time home buyer." An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and has not owned or purchased directly or through a trust, limited liability company, partnership or other legal entity, either individually or jointly, a single-family residence during the three-year period prior to the purchase date of a single-family residence."First-time home buyer savings account." An account established under section 3."Qualified beneficiary." A first-time home buyer who is designated as a qualified beneficiary by the account holder of the first-time home buyer savings account."Settlement statement." A statement of receipts and disbursements from a real estate transaction, including a statement prescribed under the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-533, 88 Stat. 1724)."Single-family residence." A single-family residence owned and occupied by a qualified beneficiary as the qualified beneficiary's principal residence, which may include a manufactured home, trailer, mobile home or a unit in a condominium, cooperative or planned community.20250HB0225PN0178 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 3. Establishment of first-time home buyer savings account.(a) Designation of first-time home buyer savings account.--Beginning six months after the effective date of this subsection, an individual may open a first-time home buyer savings account with a financial institution.(b) Designation of qualified beneficiary.--An account holder shall designate no more than one first-time home buyer as the qualified beneficiary of a first-time home buyer savings account. The account holder may designate themself as the qualified beneficiary and may change the designated qualified beneficiary at any time. The account holder shall declare the qualified beneficiary on the annual personal income tax return required under the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year in which the first-time home buyer savings account is established and for any year in which the qualified beneficiary is changed.(c) Use of first-time home buyer savings account.--Money from a first-time home buyer savings account may only be used to pay or reimburse a qualified beneficiary's eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth.(d) Expenses.--The account holder may not use money held in a first-time home buyer savings account to pay expenses of administering the first-time home buyer savings account, except that a service fee may be deducted from the first-time home buyer savings account by a financial institution in which the first-time home buyer savings account is held.(e) Joint account holders.--An account holder may jointly own a first-time home buyer savings account with another person 20250HB0225PN0178 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the joint account holders file a joint personal income tax return under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(f) Qualified beneficiary of more than one first-time home buyer savings account.--An individual may be designated as the qualified beneficiary on more than one first-time home buyer savings account.(g) Contributions to first-time home buyer savings account.--(1) Subject to the limitations under section 4(d), an individual other than the account holder may contribute to a first-time home buyer savings account.(2) The maximum amount of all contributions to a first-time home buyer savings account is $150,000.(h) Transfer of money.--An account holder may withdraw money from a first-time home buyer savings account and deposit the money in a new first-time home buyer savings account held by the same or a different financial institution.Section 4. Deduction and exclusion from taxable income.(a) Deduction of contributions.--Except as otherwise provided under subsection (c), the amount contributed by an account holder to a first-time home buyer savings account during each tax year:(1) may not exceed $5,000 for an account holder who files an individual personal income tax return or $10,000 for joint account holders who file a joint personal income tax return; and(2) shall be deductible, up to the contribution limits in paragraph (1), from the taxable income of the account holder under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 during the tax year the contribution was made.20250HB0225PN0178 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Exclusion of earnings.--Except as otherwise provided under subsection (c), the amount of earnings on a first-time home buyer savings account during the tax year may be excluded from the taxable income of an account holder under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(c) Limitations on deductions and exclusions.--An account holder may claim a deduction and exclusion under this section:(1) for a period of no more than 10 years;(2) for an aggregate amount of principal and earnings not to exceed $50,000 within 10 years; and(3) except as otherwise provided in section 3(h), only if the principal and earnings of a first-time home buyer savings account remain in the first-time home buyer savings account until a withdrawal is made for the eligible costs relating to the purchase of a single-family residence by a qualified beneficiary.(d) Nonaccount holders.--An individual other than the account holder who deposits money in a first-time home buyer savings account under section 3(g) is not entitled to the deduction and exclusion provided for under this section.(e) Remaining money.--Money in a first-time home buyer savings account not expended on eligible costs before expiration of the 10-year period under subsection (c)(1) shall be included in the account holder's taxable income under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(f) Application to alternative basis taxation.--The deduction and exclusion from taxable income shall apply to any alternative basis for calculating taxable income under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 5. Reporting.20250HB0225PN0178 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The account holder shall submit to the department all of the following:(1) Upon a withdrawal of money from a first-time home buyer savings account, a detailed account of the eligible costs toward which the money was applied and a statement of the amount of money remaining in the first-time home buyer savings account.(2) With the account holder's personal income tax return:(i) information regarding the first-time home buyer savings account, including a list of transactions for the first-time home buyer savings account during the tax year; and(ii) the form 1099 issued by the financial institution holding the first-time home buyer savings account.(3) Any other information as required by the department.Section 6. Financial institutions.(a) Limitations on financial institutions.--A financial institution may not be required or be held liable to do any of the following:(1) Designate an account as a first-time home buyer savings account or designate a qualified beneficiary of a first-time home buyer savings account in a financial institution's account contracts or systems.(2) Track the use of money withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account.(3) Allocate money in a first-time home buyer savings account among joint account holders or multiple qualified beneficiaries.20250HB0225PN0178 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Report any information to the department or any other governmental agency that is not otherwise required by law.(5) Determine if an account satisfies the requirements to be a first-time home buyer savings account.(6) Ensure that money in a first-time home buyer savings account is used for eligible costs.(7) Report or remit taxes or penalties related to the use of a first-time home buyer savings account.(b) Distribution of money.--Upon proof of the death of the account holder, a financial institution shall distribute the first-time home buyer savings account in accordance with the contract terms governing the first-time home buyer savings account.Section 7. Withdrawal for purpose other than eligible costs.Except as permitted under section 3(h), if an account holder or beneficiary withdraws any amount from a first-time home buyer savings account and uses the withdrawal for a purpose other than eligible costs:(1) The entire amount withdrawn shall be included in the account holder's taxable income as interest income under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year the withdrawal was made.(2) The account holder or beneficiary shall pay to the department a penalty equal to 10% of the amount withdrawn. The penalty shall not apply to money withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account that was:(i) withdrawn by reason of the account holder's or the beneficiary's death or disability; or(ii) a disbursement of assets of the first-time home 20250HB0225PN0178 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 buyer savings account pursuant to a filing for protection under 11 U.S.C. (relating to bankruptcy).Section 8. Department of Revenue.(a) Duties.--The department shall prepare forms:(1) to designate an account with a financial institution to serve as a first-time home buyer savings account;(2) to designate a qualified beneficiary of a first-time home buyer savings account; and(3) for an account holder to annually submit to the department detailed information regarding the first-time home buyer savings account, including, but not limited to, a list of transactions for the first-time home buyer savings account during the tax year and identifying any supporting documentation that is required to be maintained by the account holder.(b) Rules and regulations.--The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer and enforce this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0225PN0178 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920